Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB531.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7823 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7823. Award of grants.* * *(d) 2024-2025 grant cycle.--The State Fire Commissioner shall award a grant under this section during the 2024-2025 grant cycle to a fire company or an emergency medical services company if, after receiving notice from the Office of the State Fire Commissioner that the company was eligible, received a second notice that the company was deemed ineligible. This section shall only apply to the 2024-2025 grant cycle.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.123456789101112131415161718